District of Columbia statutes.
16-706

Enforcement of judgments; commitment upon non-payment of fine.

The Superior Court may enforce any of its judgments rendered in criminal cases by fine or imprisonment, or both. Except as otherwise provided by law, and subject to the relief provided in section 3569 of title 18, United States Code , in any case where the court imposes a fine, the court may, in the event of default in the payment of the fine imposed, commit the defendant for a term not to exceed one year.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 559, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 556, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(d)(5)

Cross References

Victims of violent crime, assessment nonpayment sanctions in accordance with this section, see § 4-516.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 4-516.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-706.
1973 Ed., § 16-706.

References in Text

Section 3569 of Title 18 of the United States Code, referred to in the second sentence, provided for the discharge of indigent prisoners, and was repealed by § 212 of Pub. L. 98-472.